mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX H3 Y 129
SFX H3 0 вээс р
SFX H3 0 вэл р
SFX H3 0 дэг/070873 р
SFX H3 0 дэгсэн р
SFX H3 0 дэггүйсэн р
SFX H3 0 дэгчлэн р
SFX H3 0 дгийнх/070873 р
SFX H3 0 зэнэ р
SFX H3 0 лээ р
SFX H3 0 мээнжин р
SFX H3 0 мээр/08 р
SFX H3 0 мээрсэн р
SFX H3 0 мээргүйсэн р
SFX H3 0 мэгц/03 р
SFX H3 0 мүй р
SFX H3 0 нэм р
SFX H3 0 нэ р
SFX H3 0 рүүн р
SFX H3 0 сээр р
SFX H3 0 сэн/070873 р
SFX H3 0 сэнчлэн р
SFX H3 0 снийх/070873 р
SFX H3 0 снүүд/070873 р
SFX H3 0 сү р
SFX H3 0 сүгэй р
SFX H3 0 тэл р
SFX H3 0 тлээ р
SFX H3 0 түгэй р
SFX H3 0 үүжин [^эи]р
SFX H3 0 үүзэй [^эи]р
SFX H3 0 үүштэй [^эи]р
SFX H3 0 ч р
SFX H3 0 чүхүй р
SFX H3 0 чээ р
SFX H3 0 шгүй/73 р   
SFX H3 0 ье р
SFX H3 0 ьюү р
SFX H3 эр рээ/08 эр
SFX H3 эр рээгүйсэн эр
SFX H3 эр рээд эр
SFX H3 эр рээдүй эр
SFX H3 эр рээрэй эр
SFX H3 эр рээсэй эр
SFX H3 эр рээч эр
SFX H3 эр рэв эр
SFX H3 эр рэм эр
SFX H3 эр рэвч эр
SFX H3 эр рэг эр
SFX H3 эр рэгтүн эр
SFX H3 эр рэгч/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэгчид/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэгсэд/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэгчдийнх/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэгсдийнх/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэгчийнх/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэлгүй эр
SFX H3 эр рэлтэй эр
SFX H3 эр рэлгүйгээр эр
SFX H3 эр рэмгий эр
SFX H3 эр рэмгүй эр
SFX H3 эр рэмз эр
SFX H3 эр рэмтгий эр
SFX H3 эр рэмхий эр
SFX H3 эр рэн эр
SFX H3 эр рэнгээ эр
SFX H3 эр рэнгүүт/03 эр
SFX H3 эр рэх/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэхээр/08 эр
SFX H3 эр рэхээргүйсэн эр
SFX H3 эр рэхлээр/03 эр
SFX H3 эр рэхсэн эр
SFX H3 эр рэхүй/73 эр
SFX H3 эр рэхүйн эр
SFX H3 эр рэхүйнх/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэхүйц/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэхүйцийнх/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рэхүл эр
SFX H3 эр рэхчээ эр
SFX H3 эр рэхчээн эр
SFX H3 эр рэхийнх/070873 эр
SFX H3 эр рүүжин эр
SFX H3 эр рүүзэй эр
SFX H3 эр рүүштэй эр
SFX H3 ир рээ/08 ир
SFX H3 ир рээгүйсэн ир
SFX H3 ир рээд ир
SFX H3 ир рээдүй ир
SFX H3 ир рээрэй ир
SFX H3 ир рээсэй ир
SFX H3 ир рээч ир
SFX H3 ир рэв ир
SFX H3 ир рэм ир
SFX H3 ир рэвч ир
SFX H3 ир рэг ир
SFX H3 ир рэгтүн ир
SFX H3 ир рэгч/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэгчид/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэгсэд/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэгчдийнх/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэгсдийнх/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэгчийнх/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэлгүй ир
SFX H3 ир рэлтэй ир
SFX H3 ир рэлгүйгээр ир
SFX H3 ир рэмгий ир
SFX H3 ир рэмгүй ир
SFX H3 ир рэмз ир
SFX H3 ир рэмтгий ир
SFX H3 ир рэмхий ир
SFX H3 ир рэн ир
SFX H3 ир рэнгээ ир
SFX H3 ир рэнгүүт/03 ир
SFX H3 ир рэх/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэхээр/08 ир
SFX H3 ир рэхээргүйсэн ир
SFX H3 ир рэхлээр/03 ир
SFX H3 ир рэхсэн ир
SFX H3 ир рэхүй/73 ир
SFX H3 ир рэхүйн ир
SFX H3 ир рэхүйнх/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэхүйц/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэхүйцийнх/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рэхүл ир
SFX H3 ир рэхчээ ир
SFX H3 ир рэхчээн ир
SFX H3 ир рэхийнх/070873 ир
SFX H3 ир рүүжин ир
SFX H3 ир рүүзэй ир
SFX H3 ир рүүштэй ир

SFX I3 Y 74
SFX I3 0 вээс .
SFX I3 0 вэл .
SFX I3 0 дэг/070873 .
SFX I3 0 дэгсэн .
SFX I3 0 дэггүйсэн .
SFX I3 0 дэгийнх/070873 .
SFX I3 0 жүхүй .
SFX I3 0 жээ .
SFX I3 0 зэнэ .
SFX I3 0 лээ .
SFX I3 0 мээнжин .
SFX I3 0 мээр/08 .
SFX I3 0 мэгц/03 .
SFX I3 0 мүй .
SFX I3 0 нэм .
SFX I3 0 нэ .
SFX I3 0 рүүн .
SFX I3 0 сээр .
SFX I3 0 сэн/070873 .
SFX I3 0 сэнчлэн .
SFX I3 0 сү .
SFX I3 0 сүгэй .
SFX I3 0 тэл/03 .
SFX I3 0 түгэй .
SFX I3 0 чүхүй .
SFX I3 0 ье .
SFX I3 0 ээ/08 .
SFX I3 0 ээгүйсэн .
SFX I3 0 ээд .
SFX I3 0 ээдүй .
SFX I3 0 ээрэй .
SFX I3 0 ээсэй .
SFX I3 0 ээч .
SFX I3 0 эв .
SFX I3 0 эвч .
SFX I3 0 эг .
SFX I3 0 эгтүн .
SFX I3 0 эгч/070873 .
SFX I3 0 эгчдийнх/070873 .
SFX I3 0 эгсдийнх/070873 .
SFX I3 0 эгчид/070873 .
SFX I3 0 эгсэд/070873 .
SFX I3 0 эгчийнх/070873 .
SFX I3 0 эж .
SFX I3 0 элгүй .
SFX I3 0 элтэй .
SFX I3 0 элгүйгээр .
SFX I3 0 эмгий .
SFX I3 0 эмгүй .
SFX I3 0 эмз .
SFX I3 0 эмтгий .
SFX I3 0 эмхий .
SFX I3 0 эн .
SFX I3 0 энгээ .
SFX I3 0 энгүүт/03 .
SFX I3 0 эх/070873 .
SFX I3 0 эхээр/08 .
SFX I3 0 эхээргүйсэн .
SFX I3 0 эхгүйсэн .
SFX I3 0 эхлээр/03 .
SFX I3 0 эхсэн .
SFX I3 0 эхтэй .
SFX I3 0 үүштэй .
SFX I3 0 үүзэй .
SFX I3 0 хүй/73 .
SFX I3 0 хүйн .
SFX I3 0 хүйнх/070873 .
SFX I3 0 хүйц/070873 .
SFX I3 0 хүйцийнх/070873 .
SFX I3 0 хүл .
SFX I3 0 эхчээ .
SFX I3 0 эхчээн .
SFX I3 0 эхийнх/070873 .
SFX I3 0 эшгүй/73 .

SFX J0 Y 16
SFX J0 0 /0408 .
SFX J0 0 г/00 [^и]
SFX J0 0 гаар/00 [^и]
SFX J0 0 гаас/00 [^и]
SFX J0 0 гийн [^и]
SFX J0 0 гийнд/00 [^и]
SFX J0 0 гийнх/040870 [^и]
SFX J0 0 д .
SFX J0 0 даа .
SFX J0 0 а и
SFX J0 0 йг/00 и
SFX J0 0 ар/00 и
SFX J0 0 ас/00 и
SFX J0 0 йн и
SFX J0 0 йнд/00 и
SFX J0 0 йнх/040870 и

SFX J1 Y 16
SFX J1 0 /0508 .
SFX J1 0 г/01 [^и]
SFX J1 0 гоор/01 [^и]
SFX J1 0 гоос/01 [^и]
SFX J1 0 гийн [^и]
SFX J1 0 гийнд/01 [^и]
SFX J1 0 гийнх/050871 [^и]
SFX J1 0 д .
SFX J1 0 доо .
SFX J1 0 о и
SFX J1 0 йг/01 и
SFX J1 0 ор/01 и
SFX J1 0 ос/01 и
SFX J1 0 йн и
SFX J1 0 йнд/01 и
SFX J1 0 йнх/050871 и

SFX J2 Y 16
SFX J2 0 /0608 .
SFX J2 0 г/02 [^и]
SFX J2 0 гөөр/02 [^и]
SFX J2 0 гөөс/02 [^и]
SFX J2 0 гийн [^и]
SFX J2 0 гийнд/02 [^и]
SFX J2 0 гийнх/060872 [^и]
SFX J2 0 д .
SFX J2 0 дөө .
SFX J2 0 ө и
SFX J2 0 йг/02 и
SFX J2 0 өр/02 и
SFX J2 0 өс/02 и
SFX J2 0 йн и
SFX J2 0 йнд/02 и
SFX J2 0 йнх/060872 и

SFX J3 Y 16
SFX J3 0 /0708 .
SFX J3 0 г/03 [^и]
SFX J3 0 гээр/03 [^и]
SFX J3 0 гээс/03 [^и]
SFX J3 0 гийн [^и]
SFX J3 0 гийнд/03 [^и]
SFX J3 0 гийнх/070873 [^и]
SFX J3 0 д .
SFX J3 0 дээ .
SFX J3 0 э и
SFX J3 0 йг/03 и
SFX J3 0 эр/03 и
SFX J3 0 эс/03 и
SFX J3 0 йн и
SFX J3 0 йнд/03 и
SFX J3 0 йнх/070873 и

SFX K0 Y 8
SFX K0 0 /0408 .
SFX K0 0 г/00 .
SFX K0 0 гаар/00 .
SFX K0 0 гаас/00 .
SFX K0 0 гийн .
SFX K0 0 гийнд/00 .
SFX K0 0 гийнх/040870 .
SFX K0 0 д/00 .

SFX K1 Y 8
SFX K1 0 /0508 .
SFX K1 0 г/01 .
SFX K1 0 гоор/01 .
SFX K1 0 гоос/01 .
SFX K1 0 гийн .
SFX K1 0 гийнд/01 .
SFX K1 0 гийнх/050871 .
SFX K1 0 д/01 .

SFX K2 Y 8
SFX K2 0 /0608 .
SFX K2 0 г/02 .
SFX K2 0 гөөр/02 .
SFX K2 0 гөөс/02 .
SFX K2 0 гийн .
SFX K2 0 гийнд/02 .
SFX K2 0 гийнх/060872 .
SFX K2 0 д/02 .

SFX K3 Y 8
SFX K3 0 /0708 .
SFX K3 0 г/03 .
SFX K3 0 гээр/03 .
SFX K3 0 гээс/03 .
SFX K3 0 гийн .
SFX K3 0 гийнд/03 .
SFX K3 0 гийнх/070873 .
SFX K3 0 д/03 .

SFX L0 Y 8
SFX L0 0 /0408 .
SFX L0 а ыг/00 а
SFX L0 0 ар/00 а
SFX L0 0 ас/00 а
SFX L0 а ын а
SFX L0 0 д/00 а
SFX L0 а ынх/040870 а
SFX L0 а ынд/00 .

SFX L1 Y 8
SFX L1 0 /0508 .
SFX L1 о ыг/01 о
SFX L1 0 ор/01 о
SFX L1 0 ос/01 о
SFX L1 о ын о
SFX L1 0 д/01 о
SFX L1 о ынх/050871 о
SFX L1 о ынд/01 .

SFX L2 Y 8
SFX L2 0 /0608 .
SFX L2 ө ийг/02 ө
SFX L2 0 өр/02 ө
SFX L2 0 өс/02 ө
SFX L2 ө ийн ө
SFX L2 0 д/02 ө
SFX L2 ө ийнх/060872 ө
SFX L2 ө ийнд/02 .

SFX L3 Y 8
SFX L3 0 /0708 .
SFX L3 э ийг/03 э
SFX L3 0 эр/03 э
SFX L3 0 эс/03 э
SFX L3 э ийн э
SFX L3 0 д/03 э
SFX L3 э ийнх/070873 э
SFX L3 э ийнд/03 .

SFX 0J Y 4
SFX 0J 0 нууд/040870 [^и]	+PL
SFX 0J 0 нуудынх/040870 [^и]	+PL
SFX 0J 0 уд/040870 и	+PL
SFX 0J 0 удынх/040870 и	+PL

SFX 1J Y 4
SFX 1J 0 нууд/040870 [^и]	+PL
SFX 1J 0 нуудынх/040870 [^и]	+PL
SFX 1J 0 уд/040870 и	+PL
SFX 1J 0 удынх/040870 и	+PL

SFX 2J Y 4
SFX 2J 0 нүүд/070873 [^и]	+PL
SFX 2J 0 нүүдийнх/070873 [^и]	+PL
SFX 2J 0 үд/070873 и	+PL
SFX 2J 0 үдийнх/070873 и	+PL

SFX 3J Y 4
SFX 3J 0 нүүд/070873 [^и]	+PL
SFX 3J 0 нүүдийнх/070873 [^и]	+PL
SFX 3J 0 үд/070873 и	+PL
SFX 3J 0 үдийнх/070873 и	+PL

SFX 0K Y 2
SFX 0K 0 нууд/040870 .	+PL
SFX 0K 0 нуудынх/040870 .	+PL

SFX 1K Y 2
SFX 1K 0 нууд/040870 .	+PL
SFX 1K 0 нуудынх/040870 .	+PL

SFX 2K Y 2
SFX 2K 0 нүүд/070873 .	+PL
SFX 2K 0 нүүдийнх/070873 .	+PL

SFX 3K Y 2
SFX 3K 0 нүүд/070873 .	+PL
SFX 3K 0 нүүдийнх/070873 .	+PL
